extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/condition-utf.aff
SET UTF-8
WORDCHARS 0123456789

SFX S N 18
SFX S   0 suf1 .
SFX S   0 suf2  ó
SFX S   0 suf3  [áéóú]
SFX S   0 suf4  [^ó]
SFX S   0 suf5  [^áéóú]
SFX S   0 suf6  őó
SFX S   0 suf7  ő[áéóú]
SFX S   0 suf8  ő[^ó]
SFX S   0 suf9  ő[^áéóú]
SFX S   0 suf10 [áéóőú]ó
SFX S   0 suf11 [^ő]ó
SFX S   0 suf12 [^áéóőú]ó
SFX S   0 suf13 [áéőú][^ú]
SFX S   0 suf14 [^ú][áéóú]
SFX S   0 suf15 [áéóú][^áéőú]
SFX S   0 suf16 [^áéóú][^áéőú]
SFX S   0 suf17 [áéóú][bcdfgkmnóprstvz]
SFX S   0 suf18 [áéóú]ó

PFX P N 18
PFX P   0 pre1 .
PFX P   0 pre2  ó
PFX P   0 pre3  [áéóú]
PFX P   0 pre4  [^ó]
PFX P   0 pre5  [^áéóú]
PFX P   0 pre6  óő
PFX P   0 pre7  ó[áéőú]
PFX P   0 pre8  ó[^ő]
PFX P   0 pre9  ó[^áéóőú]
PFX P   0 pre10 [áéóőú]ő
PFX P   0 pre11 [^ó]ő
PFX P   0 pre12 [^áéóőú]ő
PFX P   0 pre13 [áéóú][áéőú]
PFX P   0 pre14 [áéóú][^áéóú]
PFX P   0 pre15 [áéóú][^áéőú]
PFX P   0 pre16 [^áéőú][^áéóú]
PFX P   0 pre17 [bcdfgkmnóprstvz][áéóú]
PFX P   0 pre18 ó[áéóú]
