extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/condition-utf.good
óőó
óőósuf1
pre1óőó
óőósuf2
pre2óőó
óőósuf3
pre3óőó
óőósuf6
pre6óőó
óőósuf7
pre7óőó
óőósuf10
pre10óőó
óőósuf13
pre13óőó
óőósuf14
pre14óőó
óőósuf16
pre16óőó
