extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/condition-utf.wrong
óőósuf4
pre4óőó
óőósuf5
pre5óőó
óőósuf8
pre8óőó
óőósuf9
pre9óőó
óőósuf11
pre11óőó
óőósuf12
pre12óőó
óőósuf15
pre15óőó
óőósuf17
óőósuf18
pre17óőó
pre18óőó
